District of Columbia statutes.
9-706

Deposit of collateral by person charged with violation.

The officer on duty in command of those employees designated by the Administrator as provided in § 9-704, may accept deposit of collateral from any person charged with the violation of any rule or regulation prescribed under this chapter, for appearance in court or before the appropriate United States Magistrate; and such collateral shall be deposited with the United States Magistrate at Alexandria, Virginia.

June 29, 1940, ch. 444, § 6
as added May 15, 1947, 61 Stat. 94, ch. 62
1981 Ed., § 7-1106.
1973 Ed., § 7-1306.